Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.430

Enforcement provisions.

The director may refer a complaint for violation of any section of this chapter before any court of competent jurisdiction.

The prosecuting attorney of each county shall prosecute any violation of the provisions of this chapter that occurs in the prosecuting attorney's county, and if the prosecuting attorney fails to act, the director may request the attorney general to take action in lieu of the prosecuting attorney.

Process issued by the director shall extend to all parts of the state, and may be served by any person authorized to serve process of courts of record, or may be mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the licensee's last business address of record in the office of the director.

Whenever the director believes from evidence satisfactory to the director that a person has violated any of the provisions of this chapter, or any order, license, decision, demand or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, the director may bring an action, in the superior court in the county wherein the person resides, to enjoin that person from continuing the violation or engaging therein or doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof. In this action an order or judgment may be entered awarding a preliminary or final injunction as may be proper.

The director may petition the superior court in any county in this state for the immediate appointment of a receiver to take over, operate or close any real estate office in this state which is found, upon inspection of its books and records to be operating in violation of the provisions of this chapter, pending a hearing.

[ 2008 c 23 s 44; 1997 c 322 s 24; 1967 c 22 s 2; 1957 c 52 s 48; 1953 c 235 s 16. Prior: (i) 1941 c 252 s 21, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8340-44, part. (ii) 1947 c 203 s 6; 1941 c 252 s 22; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-45. Formerly RCW 18.85.350.]